Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1615
Public employees; coverage authorized.

Any political subdivision, community college, municipal corporation, or public body of the State of Nebraska, except a state agency defined in section 81-8,239.01, may establish, participate in, and administer plans for the benefit of its employees or its employees and their dependents, which will provide hospitalization, medical, surgical, sickness and accident, and term life insurance coverage or any one or more of such coverages. The plans shall be purchased from an insurer holding a certificate of authority to transact the business of insurance in this state except as provided in the Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act.

Laws 1959, c. 213, § 1, p. 735;

Laws 1963, c. 269, § 1, p. 804;

Laws 1971, LB 177, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 37, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 27.

Political Subdivisions Self-Funding Benefits Act, see section 13-1601.